Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 3
APPLICATION

11-101-301. Application of code.

This code governs the incorporation, organization, corporate functions, merger, consolidation, purchase and assumption, sale of assets, liquidation, dissolution, and reorganization procedures of corporations operating as banks (whether or not, as a part of and in conjunction with such operations, they engage in the trust or safe deposit business) in the state of Colorado; but articles 10.5 and 101 to 107 of this title only apply to trust companies organized and operating under article 109 of this title when specifically provided in articles 10.5 and 101 to 109 of this title, and article 109 of this title otherwise governs exclusively trust companies.

The regulation of banking is a matter of statewide concern, and in order to maintain a uniform statewide system of banking and bank regulatory policy in Colorado, the regulation by a political subdivision of deposits, lending, or other services or products provided by banks in accordance with applicable state or federal law shall be prohibited except to the extent expressly permitted under article 10.5 of this title.
(2) (a) (I) The regulation of banking is a matter of statewide concern, and in order to maintain a uniform statewide system of banking and bank regulatory policy in Colorado, the regulation by a political subdivision of deposits, lending, or other services or products provided by banks in accordance with applicable state or federal law shall be prohibited except to the extent expressly permitted under article 10.5 of this title.

Nothing in this subsection (2) shall preclude a political subdivision from enacting and enforcing laws or rules of general applicability concerning public health, safety, or welfare.

For the purposes of this section, "political subdivision" means and includes every county, city and county, city, town, school district, special district, and housing authority within the state.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1052, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1472, § 32, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-1-105 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-101-302. No private right of action.

Except as expressly provided in this code, no person, other than the banking board, shall have the right to bring or maintain any private action, at law or in equity, for a violation of or enforcement of this code.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1053, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-1-106 as it existed prior to 2003.